Washington statutes.
RCW 11.42.110

Effect of judgment against notice agent.

The effect of a judgment rendered against the notice agent shall be only to establish the amount of the judgment as an allowed claim.

[ 1997 c 252 s 35; 1994 c 221 s 41.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.